New Jersey, session 221, S464.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.1954, c.86 (C.54:1-35.3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    True value for the purposes of this act shall be deemed to be valuation at current market prices or values, determined in such manner as the director may, in his discretion, select.  The director shall determine the ratio of aggregate assessed to aggregate true valuation of real estate of each taxing district.   He may make such determination by reference to the county equalization table  whenever he is satisfied that the table has been prepared according to accepted  methods and practices and that it properly reflects true value or a known  percentage thereof for the several taxing districts in the county.  The director, with respect to any and all taxing districts, may use the assessment ratios reported in the Sixth Report of the Commission on State Tax Policy (Trenton, 1953) and may consider such other assessment ratio studies as may be available.  He may make such further and different investigations of assessment practices as he may deem necessary or desirable for the establishment of the assessment ratios required by this act.  In determining usable sales for the purposes of promulgating a table of equalized valuations, the director shall include sales of properties in age-restricted developments by third parties such as guardians, trustees, executors, and administrators. (cf: P.L.1954, c.86, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.